District of Columbia statutes.
2-1301

Intent of Council.

It is the intent of the Council of the District of Columbia that the District government shall ensure that a full range of health, education, employment, and social services shall be available to the Latino community in the District of Columbia. The planning and monitoring of programs undertaken by the Office on Latino Affairs and the Commission in partnership with members of the Latino community, families, community leaders, private agencies, and the District of Columbia government shall serve as an impetus to making the Latino community an integral part of the District of Columbia community.

History

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title I, § 101, 23 DCR 2543

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2301.
1973 Ed., § 6-1901.

Editor's Notes

Office of Spanish Affairs abolished: The Office of Spanish Affairs was abolished by the Act of September 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, which Act established the Office on Latino Affairs.